Hawaii statutes.
[§448B-4] Licensure required. No
person shall purport to be a "licensed dietitian" or use the letters
"L.D." in connection with the person's name, or use any words or
symbols indicating or tending to indicate that the person is a licensed
dietitian without meeting the applicable requirements and holding a license as
set forth in this chapter. [L 2000, c 280, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next